Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.120

Guaranty fund—Replenishment—Dividends.

(1) If at the close of any dividend period the guaranty fund of a savings bank is less than ten percent of the amount due to depositors, there shall be deducted from its net earnings and credited to its guaranty fund not less than five percent of its net earnings for such period.

(2) The balance of its net earnings for such dividend period, plus any earnings from prior accounting periods not previously disbursed and not reserved for losses or other contingencies or required to be maintained in the guaranty fund, shall be available for dividends.

While the trustees of such savings bank are paying its expenses or any portion thereof, the amounts to be credited to its guaranty fund shall be computed at the same percentage upon the total dividends credited to its depositors instead of upon its net earnings. If the guaranty fund accumulated from earnings equals or exceeds ten percent of the amount due to depositors, the minimum dividend shall be four percent, if the net earnings for such period are sufficient therefor.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.08.120. Prior: 1941 c 15 s 4; 1929 c 123 s 3; 1927 c 184 s 6; 1915 c 175 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3353.]